Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF863.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; OPERATION PRAIRIE VENTURE.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Operation Prairie Venture, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to predesign, design, construct, furnish, and equip an assisted living and memory care facility in the city of Slayton. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end